Hawaii, session 2025, HB569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Community policing programs.  (a)  The department shall collaborate with the department of law enforcement and respective county police departments to offer the following programs in all department schools: (1)  Drug Abuse Resistance Education (D.A.R.E.); (2)  Law Enforcement Explorers Programs (L.E.E.P.); and (3)  Police Activities Leagues (P.A.L.). (b)  There shall be a designated school faculty member liaison to administer the programs listed in paragraph (a).  For each school with a school resource officer, the officer shall serve as the designated school faculty member liaison. (c)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________